Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-4]
Authorization of the University of Hawaii system. The University of Hawaii
system, established as an educational institution pursuant to article X,
section 5, of the Hawaii State Constitution, is hereby authorized by the State
to provide educational programs in and from this State. The University of
Hawaii system shall be subject to section 305J-17.
The department may impose sanctions pursuant to section 305J-11
on the University of Hawaii system in accordance with the requirements of this
chapter. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next